Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.210

Authority of director to seek removal by the board of a state trust company.

(1) In addition to any other remedy set forth in this chapter, the director may notify, in writing, the board of directors of any state trust company that the director has information that any member of the board of directors, officer, manager, employee, or agent of the state trust company or affiliate of the state trust company is dishonest, reckless, or incompetent, or is failing to perform any duty required of the state trust company or such affiliate.

(2) The board shall then meet to consider such matter as soon as reasonably feasible, but no later than thirty calendar days of the director's notice.

(3) The director shall have notice of the time and place of such meeting and an opportunity to appear at such meeting and address the board of directors concerning the director's information.

(4) If the board finds the director's information to be well-founded, and the affected member of the board of directors, officer, employee, or agent of the state trust company or such affiliate is working under an employment contract or independent contractor agreement that prohibits termination without cause, the board shall notify such member of the board of directors, officer, employee, or agent of the board's intent to remove him or her from the position, or to otherwise instruct such affiliate to do so, as applicable. Such notice shall be in writing and include:

(a) Notice of the allegations;

(b) Specific facts supporting the allegations; and

(c) A time and place at which such member of the board of directors, officer, employee, or agent will have an opportunity to be heard before a final action is taken by the board.

(5) Pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the board shall set the time and place of the meeting no sooner than ten business days after such member of the board of directors, officer, employee, or agent receives notice of the board's intent to remove or terminate the contract.

(6) If the board finds the director's information to be well-founded, and the affected member of the board of directors, officer, manager, employee, or agent may be terminated without cause, such director, officer, manager, employee, or agent may be removed by the state trust company or such affiliate, or their contract may be terminated, at the option of the board.

(7) If the board does not remove such director, officer, employee, or agent, or if the board fails to meet, consider, or act upon the director's information within twenty days after receiving the same, then the director may within twenty days after, or earlier in the case of the necessity of an emergency order under RCW 30B.10.070, seek removal of such person by complying with the applicable provisions of this chapter.

(8) This section shall not be deemed to be an exclusive remedy of the department. The department may exercise any other remedies available to it under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 389 s 28.]